Utah statutes.
13-14-308.   Private right of action.

(1)  A franchisee has a private right of action for actual damages and reasonable attorney fees against a franchisor for a violation of this chapter that results in damage to the franchisee.

(2) (a)  As used in this Subsection (2):

(i)  "New franchisor" has the same meaning as defined in Section 13-14-302.5.

(ii)  "Reinstated franchise" has the same meaning as defined in Section 13-14-302.5.

(iii)  "Reinstated franchisee" has the same meaning as defined in Section 13-14-302.5.

(b)  A reinstated franchisee has a private right of action for actual damages and reasonable attorney fees against a new franchisor if:

(i)  the new franchisor:

(A)  establishes a new franchisee of the same line-make as a line-make of the reinstated franchisee within the relevant market area of the reinstated franchisee; or

(B)  adds a line-make to another franchisor's existing franchisee within the relevant market area of the reinstated franchisee that is the same line-make as a line-make of the reinstated franchisee; and

(ii)  the franchisor's action under Subsection (2)(b)(i) causes a substantial diminution in value of the reinstated franchisee's reinstated franchise.

(c)  A new franchisor may not be held liable under Subsection (2)(b) based on a franchisee's purchase of another existing franchise, both of which are within the relevant market area of a reinstated franchisee, for the purpose of combining the purchased franchise with the franchise of the purchasing franchisee.

